Tennessee statutes. Title 18 Clerks Of Courts
Part 1

Qualifications and Conduct of Office

18-1-101. Selection and general functions.

Each of the courts has a clerk, elected or appointed for a term of years, whose duty it is to attend the court and perform all the clerical functions of the court.

Code 1858, § 320 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 2); Shan., § 396; Code 1932, § 646; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-101.

Cross-References. Deputies and assistants, §§8-20-101 —8-20-111.

Elected by the people, §2-1-101.

Elections, time for holding, §2-3-202.

Examination and filing of bond, §§8-19-201,8-19-203.

Specific fees authorized, §8-21-401.

State system of personnel administration, §8-30-101 et seq.

Summary judgment against clerk, §§25-3-111 —25-3-113.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, §§ 2-4.

Law Reviews.

Special Project: Criminal Procedure as Defined by the Tennessee Supreme Court (Julian L. Bibb and Walter Sillers Weems), 30 Vand. L. Rev. 691.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

Attorney General Opinions. The clerk serving as the clerk of the Obion County Juvenile Court must attend the sessions of the court or provide a deputy clerk to do so; in addition, while the statute does not expressly provide that a clerk has a duty to record court sessions or to prepare or draft court orders, such duties fall within the “clerical functions” of a court within the meaning of the statute, OAG 00-112 (6/20/00).

Comparative Legislation. General provisions:

Ala. Code §12-2-90 et seq.; §12-17-80 et seq.; §12-17-140 et seq.

Ark. Code §16-20-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §15-2-40 et seq.; §15-6-50.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. §§ 21A.030, 22A.040, 30A.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §9-3-13 et seq.; §9-5-131 et seq.; §9-7-121 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. §§ 476.360, 483.010 et seq.; § 483.500 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. §§ 7A-11, 7A-40, 7A-100 et seq.

Va. Code §§ 17-33 — 17-92.

Cited: State v. Cole, 81 Tenn. 367, 1884 Tenn. LEXIS 51 (1884); Robertson v. Giant Food Market, Inc., 210 Tenn. 356, 358 S.W.2d 338, 1962 Tenn. LEXIS 446 (1962); West v. Vought Aircraft Indus., 256 S.W.3d 618, 2008 Tenn. LEXIS 412 (Tenn. June 10, 2008).

Collateral References. 15A Am. Jur. 2d Clerks of Courts § 2.

14 C.J.S. Clerks of Courts §§ 1-3, 33.

Clerks of Courts
3.

18-1-102. Residence and office.

The clerk of each of the courts shall reside in the county in which the court is held, shall keep an office at the county seat of that county, and give due attendance at the office for the performance of official duties.

Code 1858, § 4038 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 1; 1832, ch. 7, § 2); Shan., § 5850; Code 1932, § 10050; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 5.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

18-1-103. Oath of office.

Each clerk of a court must also, before entering on the duties of the office, take an oath to support the constitutions of the United States and of this state, and to execute the duties of the office without prejudice, partiality or favor, to the best of the clerk's skill and ability; also, that the clerk has neither given nor will give to any person any gratuity, gift, fee or reward in consideration of the clerk's support for the office, and that the clerk has neither sold nor offered to sell, nor will the clerk sell, the clerk's interest in the office.

Code 1858, § 332 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, §§ 3, 50); Shan., § 408; Code 1932, § 658; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-103.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 632.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 5.

Cited: Alexander v. Marshall, 40 Tenn. 475, 1859 Tenn. LEXIS 134 (1859); Buford v. Cox, 71 Tenn. 518, 1879 Tenn. LEXIS 109 (1879); Johnson v. Brice, 112 Tenn. 59, 83 S.W. 791, 1903 Tenn. LEXIS 90 (1904); Wooley v. Madison County, 209 F. Supp. 2d 836, 2002 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12297 (W.D. Tenn. 2002).

18-1-104. Deputy's oath.

Each deputy clerk shall take the oath appointed for the qualification of public officers, and an oath faithfully to discharge the duties of the office to the best of the deputy clerk's skill and ability.

Code 1858, § 333 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 72); Shan., § 409; Code 1932, § 659; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-104.

Cited: West v. Vought Aircraft Indus., 256 S.W.3d 618, 2008 Tenn. LEXIS 412 (Tenn. June 10, 2008).

18-1-105. Duties.

It is the duty of the clerk of each of the courts to:

Sign all summons, writs, subpoenas, executions and process issued from the clerk's court, and endorse on the back thereof the date of issuance;

Keep the several dockets required by law in the respective courts, and keep a rule docket, in which shall be entered the names of complainants and defendants in full, the names of attorneys, a minute of the date of issuance and return of process, with return on process, and a note of all orders and proceedings made at office;

Not change the style of any cause, or papers in the cause, without permission of the chancellor or judge presiding, after the cause has been docketed;

Keep an execution docket, in which shall be entered, within the time after the adjournment of each court prescribed for issuing executions, all judgments or decrees, in the order of their rendition, with the names of all the plaintiffs and defendants in full, the day and year of rendition, the amount of the recovery and the amount of costs, the character and number of the execution, the date of its issuance and to what county issued, the person to whom delivered and the date of delivery, the date and substance of the return and the dates and amounts of money paid into and paid out of the clerk's office;

Keep a well-bound book, in which shall be entered the minutes of each day's proceedings during the session of the court, in the order in which they are made;

Record in well-bound books, within six (6) months after the final determination of any suit or prosecution, such proceedings as the clerk is required by law to enroll;

Make and keep indexes, direct and reverse, for all books and dockets required to be kept by the clerk;

Keep all the papers, books, dockets and records belonging to the clerk's office, with care and security; the papers filed, arranged, numbered and labeled, so as to be of easy reference; and the books, dockets and records properly lettered; and allow parties to inspect the records free of charge;

Attend court during the session of the court, with all the papers belonging to the term, so filed as to be of easy reference; keep in the courthouse, during the session, the execution docket for the two (2) preceding terms; and administer all oaths and affidavits in relation to causes or proceedings pending therein;

On application and payment of the legal fees for a transcript, make out and deliver to any person applying for the transcript, a correct transcript, properly certified, of any paper or record in the clerk's office;

Perform such duties in regard to the state and county revenue as are prescribed by law under this code;

Issue execution within the time prescribed by §§ 26-1-201 — 26-1-203; and

Perform such other duties as are, or may be, required of the clerk by law.

In the place of well-bound docket books as required in subdivisions (a)(5) and (6), the clerks may, in the alternate, subject to the approval and under the direction of the judges of the respective courts, use a file card system whereby a card would be kept in a loose-leaf file drawer under lock and key, upon which card the necessary entries required by law to be put on the docket would be made.

Any information required to be kept as a public record by a clerk of any court may be maintained on a computer or removable computer storage media in lieu of docket books or other bound books; provided, that the following standards are met:

The information is available for public inspection, unless it is a confidential record according to law;

Due care is taken to maintain the information as a public record during the time required by law for retention;

All daily data generated and stored within the computer system shall be copied to computer storage media daily, and the newly created computer storage media more than one (1) week old shall be stored at a location other than at the building where the original is maintained; and

The clerk can provide a paper copy of the information when needed or when requested by a member of the public.

Nothing in subdivision (c)(1) shall be construed as requiring the clerk to sell the media upon which the information is stored or maintained.

Install and maintain the Tennessee court information system (TnCIS) as provided by the administrative office of the courts (AOC) or a functionally equivalent computer system. The implementation of TnCIS in the offices of the court clerks shall be determined by the TnCIS steering committee and shall be based on the availability of adequate funding. The TnCIS software shall be made available to all offices of court clerks, including those offices previously automated and those offices within Shelby, Davidson, Knox and Hamilton counties.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any court clerk office having a significant investment in an existing computer system shall not be required to acquire a new computer system, or to modify or convert an existing system to utilize the TnCIS software; provided, that those court clerk offices shall maintain a computer system that will report electronically all data required under Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 11, § II, or otherwise statutorily mandated; and the AOC shall provide for the necessary data transfers with other state agencies as defined by the AOC or as statutorily required.

Code 1858, § 4040 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, §§ 9, 26; 1801, ch. 6, §§ 44, 46; 1831, ch. 8, §§ 1, 2; 1832, ch. 6, § 2); Acts 1879, ch. 114; Shan., § 5852; Code 1932, § 10052; Acts 1965, ch. 202, § 1; 1972, ch. 855, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-105; Acts 1984, ch. 772, § 2; 1992, ch. 797, § 1; 1999, ch. 486, § 3.

Cross-References. Clerk, clerical and administrative staff of board of commissioners, §§18-6-101 —18-6-103.

Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Conversion of money indictable without prosecutor, §40-13-104.

Criminal procedure, destruction of records upon dismissal or acquittal, title 40, ch. 32, part 1.

False entries indictable without prosecutor, §40-13-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 23.11, 24.31.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 12; 8 Tenn. Juris., Criminal Procedure, § 4; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 3.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

The Tennessee Court System — Criminal Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 319.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority to issue income assignment orders against child support obligors, OAG 99-008 (1/25/99).

The clerk serving as the clerk of the Obion County Juvenile Court must attend the sessions of the court or provide a deputy clerk to do so, OAG 00-112 (6/20/00).

Cited: Ellicott Mach. Corp. v. Vogt Bros. Mfg. Co., 267 F. 945, 1920 U.S. App. LEXIS 2253 (6th Cir. Ky. 1920); Nash-Echoff Motor Co. v. Kettlewell Bros., 160 Tenn. 186, 22 S.W.2d 231, 1929 Tenn. LEXIS 90 (1929); Dyer v. Dyer, 178 Tenn. 234, 156 S.W.2d 445, 1941 Tenn. LEXIS 50 (1941); Metro. Gov't of Nashville v. Affiliated Computer Servs., — F. Supp. 2d —, 2008 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 59622 (M.D. Tenn. July 17, 2008); State v. Houston, 328 S.W.3d 867, 2010 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 197 (Tenn. Crim. App. Mar. 3, 2010).

18-1-106. Judgment index.

It is the duty of the clerk of the courts of record, and they are required, to keep a judgment index in which the name of each person, partnership, firm or corporation against whom a judgment or decree is rendered shall be entered under the proper alphabet or letter of the person, partnership, firm or corporation, giving the date, number of the cause and amount of the judgment.

Each page of the index shall have five (5) columns, as follows:

Name. Date. No. Cause. Amount.

Two (2) sets of these columns may be on each page.

Acts 1897, ch. 27; Shan., § 5852a2; Code 1932, § 10054; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-106.

Cross-References. Cross index as to all parties in minute books and execution dockets, §10-7-209.

Indexing of records, title 10, ch. 7, part 2.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 642.

Collateral References. 14 C.J.S. Clerks of Courts § 39; 21 C.J.S. Courts § 226; 49 C.J.S. Judgments § 128.

18-1-107. Notation as to party requesting process.

The clerks of court, in all cases where there are two (2) or more defendants in any case, civil or criminal, and a subpoena for witnesses or other process issues on application of part only of the defendants, shall mark thereon at whose instance the subpoena is issued.

Code 1858, § 4049 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 178, § 2); Shan., § 5864; Code 1932, § 10066; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-107.

18-1-108. Authority.

The clerks of the several courts have authority to:

Administer oaths and take affidavits in all cases in which the authority to administer the oath is not confined to some other officer, and the power may be exercised either in vacation or term time;

Take depositions to be read as evidence in any judicial proceeding in this or any other state;

Take probate of the attendance of witnesses, and issue tickets, in vacation as well as term time, and in civil as well as criminal cases, at any time between the commencement and decision of a cause;

Appoint deputies with full power to transact all the business of the clerk, such deputy first taking an oath to support the constitution and laws of this state, and faithfully to discharge the duties of deputy clerk of the court for which the deputy acts;

Receive the amount of any judgment or decree rendered in the court of which they are clerks, either before or after the issue of execution on the judgment or decree; and

Exercise such other powers as are, or may be, conferred upon them by law.

In counties where the clerks and the judges wish to establish a cooperative child support collection system that will serve all courts in the counties in which child support is ordered, the clerks of those counties may enter into an agreement, approved by the respective judges, that child support shall be collected and distributed by one (1) clerk for all the clerks of the counties. The agreement shall be in writing and shall set forth all the terms and conditions for the cooperative child support system. The clerk operating the cooperative child support system for the counties shall be financially accountable and treat all payments as if the order of child support had originated in the court served by that clerk.

Code 1858, § 4050 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 32; 1845-1846, ch. 164, § 1; 1849-1850, ch. 103, § 2); Shan., § 5865; Code 1932, § 10067; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-108; Acts 1989, ch. 346, § 1.

Cross-References. Certifying attendance of jurors, §§22-4-104,22-4-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.31.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Affidavits, § 2; 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 11; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 3; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 66; 20 Tenn. Juris., Perjury, § 3.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Criminal Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 319.

Attorney General Opinions. Police sergeant appointed deputy court clerk to attest to citations, OAG 98-0138 (8/7/98).

Authority to issue income assignment orders against child support obligors, OAG 99-008 (1/25/99).

Compensation for clerk and master serving as substitute judge not authorized, OAG 99-087 (4/8/99).

Cited: Hoyle v. Wilson, 746 S.W.2d 665, 1988 Tenn. LEXIS 6 (Tenn. 1988); Underwood v. Liberty Mut. Ins. Co., 782 S.W.2d 175, 1989 Tenn. LEXIS 542 (Tenn. 1989); Vooys v. Turner, 49 S.W.3d 318, 2001 Tenn. App. LEXIS 89 (Tenn. Ct. App. 2001).

18-1-109. Acting as masters in chancery.

The clerks of the several courts, in all equity causes in their courts, are vested with the powers of clerks and masters of the chancery court.

Code 1858, § 4051 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 101); Shan., § 5866; Code 1932, § 10068; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-109.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 11.

18-1-110. Practice of law — Security on bonds.

No clerk of any court can practice law in any of the courts of this state, except as provided in §23-3-102; neither can the clerk become security for the prosecution of suits in the clerk's court, nor upon any bonds or other obligations required to be executed by the parties in the progress of the suits.

Code 1858, § 4039 (deriv. Acts 1817, ch. 51, § 2; 1826, ch. 14, § 1); Shan., § 5851; Code 1932, § 10051; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-115.

Attorney General Opinions. Ability of county commissioner to serve as clerk and master for the chancery court in the same county; ability to also engage in private practice of law. OAG 14-23, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (2/26/14).

Collateral References. 14 C.J.S. Clerks of Courts § 90.

18-1-111. Providing copy of judgment when payments to be made to court clerk — Receipt.

When a judgment is required by order of a general sessions, circuit or chancery court, or by agreement of the parties, to be paid to the court through the applicable court clerk, the clerk, upon request of the debtor, shall provide the debtor with a copy of the judgment entered by the court or the agreement between the parties.

Upon the request of the debtor, the clerk shall provide the debtor with a receipt for any amount paid by the debtor to the clerk in discharge of the judgment or the agreement between the parties.

Acts 2010, ch. 644, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§18-1-111 and18-1-112 (Code 1858, §§ 4056-4058; Code 1932, §§ 10072-10074; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 18-116, 18-117), concerning order for examination of records and examination and report of district attorney general, were repealed by Acts 1998, ch. 1080, § 8, effective May 19, 1998.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 644, § 2. March 17, 2010.

18-1-112. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§18-1-111 and18-1-112 (Code 1858, §§ 4056-4058; Code 1932, §§ 10072-10074; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 18-116, 18-117), concerning order for examination of records and examination and report of district attorney general, were repealed by Acts 1998, ch. 1080, § 8.

18-1-113. Delivery of records to successor.

Upon the suspension or removal from office of any clerk, the clerk shall, on demand of the clerk's successor or order of the court, deliver over to the successor the books, papers and other articles belonging to the office, such delivery to be enforced as provided in title 8, chapter 49.

Code 1858, § 4060 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 17, § 4); Shan., § 5875; Code 1932, § 10075; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-118.

Collateral References. 14 C.J.S. Clerks of Courts § 39.

18-1-114. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §18-1-114 (Acts 1887, ch. 246; Shan., § 421; Code 1932, § 672; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-127), concerning supreme court reports, was repealed by Acts 1995, ch. 59, § 1.

18-1-115. Judgment affecting city or county taxes furnished tax collecting officials.

It is the duty of the clerk of any court that renders a judgment or decree affecting city or county taxes to furnish a copy of the judgment or decree to the county trustee or to the city treasurer, comptroller or other municipal officers collecting taxes, as the case may be, of the county or city whose taxes are involved.

Acts 1959, ch. 131, § 1; T.C.A., § 18-128.